Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 4 Finance

Cross references. —

As to finances in relation to organization of new counties generally, see §§

18-1-301

to

18-1-320

.

As to powers of board of commissioners relative to finance generally, see §

18-3-504

.

As to duties and powers of county commissioners relative to presentation, altering and payment of claims and as to issuance of tax-anticipation warrants, see §

18-3-511

.

As to preparation and publication of annual financial statements by board of commissioners, see §

18-3-515

.

For duty of sheriff to keep cash book, and as to entries in and inspection thereof, see §

18-3-607

.

As to county treasurers generally, see §§

18-3-801

to

18-3-814

.

For constitutional provision limiting county tax levy, see art. 15, § 5, Wyo. Const.

As to depositories for public moneys, see art. 15, § 7, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation on county debt, see art. 16, § 3, Wyo. Const.

As to creation of county or municipal debt in excess of taxes for current year, see art. 16, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to school finance generally, see §

21-13-101

.

As to county tax levies for public assistance and social services purposes, see §

42-2-101

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 579 to 679; 63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Funds § 1 et seq.

When limitations begin to run against actions on public securities or obligations to be paid out of a special or particular fund, 50 ALR2d 271.

Constitutional prohibition of use of public moneys for support of religion as violated by use of public school premises for religious purposes during nonschool time, 79 ALR2d 1148.

Permissible use of funds from parking meters, 83 ALR2d 625.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 185 to 238.